Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1677
Packing juries; solicitation of jury service; penalties.

(1) If a sheriff or other officer corruptly or through favor or ill will summons a juror with the intent that such juror shall find a verdict for or against either party, or summons a grand juror from like motives with the intent that such grand juror shall or shall not find an indictment or presentment against any particular individual, the sheriff or other officer shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars, shall forfeit his or her office, and shall be forever disqualified from holding any office in this state.

(2) Any person who seeks the position of juror or who asks any attorney or other officer of the court or any other person or officer in any manner charged with the duty of selecting the jury to secure or procure his or her selection as a juror shall be guilty of contempt of court, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars, and shall thereby be disqualified from serving as a juror for that jury term.

(3) Any attorney or party to a suit pending for trial at that jury term who requests or solicits the placing of any person upon a jury, or upon any list of potential jurors for service on any grand or petit jury, shall be guilty of contempt of court and be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars, and the person so sought to be put upon the jury or list shall be disqualified to serve as a juror for that jury term.

R.S.1867, Code § 668, p. 512;

Laws 1901, c. 83, § 2, p. 477;

R.S.1913, § 8147;

C.S.1922, § 9082;

C.S.1929, § 20-1612;

R.S.1943, § 25-1612;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1612;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 34.